District of Columbia statutes.
50-1633

Courier company responsibility.

No courier company shall employ, compensate, utilize, or contract with a commercial bicycle operator who does not have a valid commercial bicycle operator’s permit and a properly registered bicycle.

Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-97, § 4, 35 DCR 1045
1981 Ed., § 40-1413.